Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 11 The Governor

11.010.
Salary. [Repealed.]

11.020.
Mansion.

The Governor shall have the use of the mansion and the furniture therein and premises, free of rent, but the purchase of furniture for the mansion shall be upon the recommendation of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and in accordance with KRS Chapter 42.

History.

4357-2: amend. Acts 1958, ch. 17, effective June 19, 1958.

11.025.
Mansion committee. [Repealed.]

11.026.
Historic Properties Advisory Commission — Historic properties endowment trust fund — Separate trust fund.

As used in this section, “state curator” means the director of the Division of Historic Properties within the Department for Facilities and Support Services in the Finance and Administration Cabinet with responsibilities for the preservation, restoration, acquisition, and conservation of all decorations, objects of art, chandeliers, china, silver, statues, paintings, furnishings, accouterments, and other aesthetic materials that have been acquired, donated, loaned, and otherwise obtained by the Commonwealth of Kentucky for the Executive Mansion, the Old Governor’s Mansion, the Vest Lindsey House, the New State Capitol, and other historic properties under the control of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Historic Properties Advisory Commission is established to provide continuing attention to the maintenance, furnishings, and repairs of the Executive Mansion, Old Governor’s Mansion, the Vest Lindsey House, and New State Capitol. The commission shall be attached to the Finance and Administration Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The commission shall consist of fourteen (14) members, one (1) of whom shall be the director of the Kentucky Heritage Council. It is recommended that one (1) shall be the state curator, one (1) shall be the executive director of the Kentucky Historical Society, one (1) shall be a resident of Franklin County with experience in restoration, one (1) shall be the director of the Executive Mansion, one (1) shall be the director of the Old Governor’s Mansion, and the remainder of the membership shall be selected from the state-at-large from persons with experience in historical restoration.

The officers of the commission shall consist of a chairman, who shall be appointed by the Governor, and a secretary, who shall be responsible for the keeping of the records and administering the directions of the commission. The state curator of the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall serve as the secretary of the commission. A member of the Governor’s family may serve as an honorary, nonvoting member of the commission. A simple majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business by the commission.

The public members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve terms of four (4) years except that of the members initially appointed, two (2) members shall serve terms of one (1) year; two (2) members shall serve terms of two (2) years; one (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years; and one (1) member shall serve a term of four (4) years. The executive director of the Historical Society and director of the Executive Mansion shall serve on the commission in an ex officio capacity. The persons holding the offices of executive director of the Historical Society, director of the Executive Mansion, director of the Kentucky Heritage Council, and state curator shall serve terms concurrent with holding their respective offices.

Each commission member shall be reimbursed for his necessary travel and other expenses actually incurred in the discharge of his duties on the commission.

There is established in the State Treasury a historic properties endowment trust fund which shall be administered by the director of the Division of Historic Properties under the supervision of the Commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon warrant of the secretary of finance and administration. The fund shall be used for carrying out the functions of the Division of Historic Properties. The Division of Historic Properties may publish written material pertaining to historic properties of the state and charge and collect a reasonable fee for any such publications. The proceeds shall be deposited to the credit of the fund and after paying the costs of publication, the balance of the proceeds shall be used for purposes specified in KRS

11.027

.

In addition to the historic properties endowment trust fund, there shall be established in the State Treasury a separate and distinct endowment trust fund known as the Ida Lee Willis-Vest Lindsey House endowment trust fund, which shall be jointly administered by the director of the Kentucky Heritage Council and the director of the Division of Historic Properties under the supervision of the commissioner of the Department for Facilities and Support Services. The fund may receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds and shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon warrant of the secretary of finance and administration. The fund shall be used solely for the benefit of, or related to, the Vest Lindsey House, including but not limited to building maintenance and repairs, structural restoration or renovation, acquisition and maintenance of furnishings or decorations, and the development of interpretative materials regarding the historical and architectural significance of the Vest Lindsey House and its relation to other sites in the North Frankfort area. The creation of the Ida Lee Willis-Vest Lindsey House endowment trust fund is intended to be a supplemental source of funds and in no way restricts the expenditure of funds from the historic properties endowment trust fund or any state fund for the benefit of the Vest Lindsey House.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 254, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 101, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 176, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 26, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 24, § 2, effective July 15, 2008; 2015 ch. 69, § 2, effective June 24, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the common-law definition of dwelling house, the jurisdiction of the Mansion Commission extends to the immediate grounds used in connection with the Executive Mansion, to the extent applicable under this section and KRS

11.027

.

OAG 83-21

.

11.027.
Meetings of commission — Duties.

The commission shall meet at least every six (6) months and when called into session by the chairman at the request of the Governor, of any two (2) or more members of the commission, or on his own motion.

The commission shall examine the Executive Mansion, the Old Governor’s Mansion, the Vest Lindsey House, and the New State Capitol at least once each year, and the commission shall have authority over any construction, repairs, structural restoration, or renovation of these properties. The commission shall supervise the maintenance of a current inventory of all furnishings in the properties and the inventory shall be maintained by the Division of Historic Properties in the Department for Facilities and Support Services in the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The Division of Historic Properties shall maintain inventory records relating to all such property of the state and no such property shall be disposed of except upon recommendation of the director of the Division of Historic Properties with advice of the Historic Properties Advisory Commission. The proceeds realized from the sale of any items shall be deposited in the historic properties endowment fund, established by KRS

11.026

, except that the proceeds realized from the sale of any items derived from, or related to, the Vest Lindsey House shall be deposited in the separate and distinct Ida Lee Willis-Vest Lindsey House endowment trust fund, established by KRS

11.026

(8).

The commission shall recommend, from time to time, on the needs for furnishings, maintenance, repair, or renovation of the Executive Mansion, the Old Governor’s Mansion, the Vest Lindsey House, and the New State Capitol; and the Department for Facilities and Support Services in the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, from funds available, take the action recommended. The commission shall have final authority over articles placed in the properties and moneys spent on these buildings, except that the Kentucky Heritage Council shall have final authority over any moneys spent from the Ida Lee Willis-Vest Lindsey House endowment trust fund. The commission shall develop criteria for this display of objects on and for the use of the public areas of the basement and first and second floors of the New State Capitol and shall be consulted by the director of the Division of Historic Properties before objects are accepted for or removed from permanent display in the Capitol.

The commission shall provide coordination and make arrangements for an orderly transition between outgoing and incoming chief executives.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 388, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 254, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 176, § 5, effective July 15, 1994; 2005, ch. 85, § 27, effective June 20, 2005; 2008, ch. 24, § 3, effective July 15, 2008.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the common-law definition of dwelling house, the jurisdiction of the Mansion Commission extends to the immediate grounds used in connection with the Executive Mansion, to the extent applicable under KRS

11.026

and this section.

OAG 83-21

.

The words “moneys spent on mansion” in subsection (3) of this section are clear and unambiguous and mean, as the legislature clearly intended, any moneys from any source spent on mansion restoration.

OAG 83-21

(Opinion prior to 1984 amendment).

The Mansion Commission’s authority extends to giving final approval on all moneys spent on mansion restoration, including final approval of gifts and donations made by private (nongovernment) entities to the Mansion Commission.

OAG 83-21

.

11.030.
Private secretary. [Repealed.]

11.031.
Gift shop in New State Capitol.

As used in this section:

“Resident of Kentucky” means an individual who resides in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or an entity that manufactures, produces, or otherwise makes goods within the Commonwealth; and

“Products made in the United States” means goods manufactured, produced, or otherwise made in the United States of America.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet may establish a gift shop in the public areas of the New State Capitol. All goods sold in the gift shop shall be products made in the United States. Not less than fifty percent (50%) of the gift shop’s inventory shall be products made by residents of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

11.040.
Personnel for Governor’s office — Office of Secretary of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet.

The Governor may appoint such persons as he deems necessary for the proper operation of his office to perform such duties as the Governor may require of them. The persons so appointed shall hold office at the pleasure of the Governor. None of the provisions of KRS

64.640

shall be applicable to persons appointed under this subsection.

There is hereby created an agency of the state government to be known as the Office of the Secretary to the Governor’s Executive Cabinet. The Office of the Secretary to the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall not be part of the Office of the Governor, but shall constitute a separate agency of state government. The secretary so appointed shall have such rights, duties and responsibilities as may be assigned by the Governor.

The position of secretary to the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall be filled by appointment of the Governor and shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The secretary shall be responsible for implementing all policies of the Governor, coordinating all activities of the Governor’s Executive Cabinet, and advising and consulting with the Governor on all policy matters affecting the state.

The Office of the Secretary to the Governor’s Executive Cabinet shall include such principal assistants, appointed by the secretary of the cabinet pursuant to KRS

12.050

, as may be necessary to execute the functions of the office.

History.

3942f-1 to 3942f-3; amend. Acts 1956, ch. 27, § 2, effective May 18, 1956; 1982, ch. 393, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where the Governor appointed a person to serve in two capacities: (1) as the Secretary of Justice under KRS

15A.010

(now repealed), whose salary is statutorily limited by KRS 64.640(2), and (2) as special assistant to the Governor, with specifically assigned duties under this section, separate and distinct from his duties as Secretary of Justice, that appointee’s total compensation should reflect his duties involved in both positions since the two positions are mutually exclusive, and since KRS 64.640(2) imposes no limitation on his salary as a special assistant under this section.

OAG 80-265

.

A member of the turnpike authority may not send a proxy, with voting power, to meetings of the turnpike authority in the absence of statutory authority granting him such delegating power; the governor (pursuant to this section), the Attorney General (pursuant to KRS 15.100(1)), and the Secretary of Development (pursuant to executive order no. 80-190) can, in writing, designate a proxy to attend the turnpike authority meetings with full voting power.

OAG 80-376

.

11.050.
Messenger’s allowance. [Repealed.]

11.060.
Governor’s General Cabinet.

The heads of the constitutional and statutory administrative departments and program cabinet secretaries enumerated in KRS

12.020

shall constitute the Governor’s General Cabinet, which shall meet upon the call of the Governor. The Governor shall be the chairman and the Governor’s private secretary shall serve as secretary of the General Cabinet. The General Cabinet shall be attached to the Office of the Governor and shall not constitute a separate department or agency of the state.

The cabinet shall consider such matters involving general administrative policies and procedure, relations between departments and other agencies and desirable measures of cooperation between departments and other agencies, as the Governor or any member may place before it; shall advise and consult with the Governor at his request on all matters affecting the welfare of the state and relating to the several departments, program cabinets and other agencies.

History.

4618-147: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 1.

11.065.
Governor’s Executive Cabinet.

The secretaries of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Education and Labor Cabinet, the Public Protection Cabinet, the Transportation Cabinet, the Cabinet for Economic Development, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, the Personnel Cabinet, the Governor’s Executive Cabinet, the chief information officer, the state budget director, the Governor’s chief of staff, and the Lieutenant Governor shall constitute the Governor’s Executive Cabinet. There shall be a vice chairman appointed by the Governor who shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Executive Cabinet. The Governor shall be the chairman, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be a second vice chairman of the Executive Cabinet. The Governor may designate others to serve as vice chairman.

The cabinet shall meet not less than once every two (2) months and at other times on call of the Governor. The Executive Cabinet shall be a part of the Office of the Governor and shall not constitute a separate department or agency of the state. Members of the cabinet shall be the major assistants to the Governor in the administration of the state government and shall assist the Governor in the proper operation of his office and perform other duties the Governor may require of them.

The cabinet shall consider matters involving policies and procedures the Governor or any member may place before it. The cabinet shall advise and consult with the Governor on all matters affecting the welfare of the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 2; 1978, ch. 155, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 186, § 19, effective March 29, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 379, § 2, effective April 9, 1982; 1982, ch. 393, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 396, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 414, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 205, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 325, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 209, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 279, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 48, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 154, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 426, § 60, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 85, § 4, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 95, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 99, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2005, ch. 123, § 1, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 211, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 16, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2014, ch. 89, § 8, effective July 15, 2014; 2014, ch. 138, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2022 ch. 236, § 5, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2014). This statute was amended by 2014 Ky. Acts chs. 89, sec. 8, and 138, sec. 1, which are identical and have been codified together.

11.066.
Creative Services Branch in the Office of the Governor. [Repealed.]

11.068.
Office of State Budget Director — Organizational units — Duties, rights, and responsibilities.

There is created an agency of state government known as the Office of State Budget Director. The office shall be attached for administrative purposes to the Office of the Governor.

The office shall include the following major organizational units:

The Office of State Budget Director, headed by the state budget director. The state budget director shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to KRS

11.040

and shall serve, under direction of the Governor, as state budget director and secretary of the state planning committee. The office shall include such principal assistants and supporting personnel appointed pursuant to KRS Chapter 12 as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the office. The office shall have such duties, rights, and responsibilities as are necessary to perform, without being limited to, the following functions:

Functions relative to the preparation, administration, and evaluation of the executive budget as provided in KRS Chapters 45 and 48 and in other laws, including but not limited to, capital construction budgeting, evaluation of state programs, program monitoring, financial and policy analysis and issue review, and executive policy implementation and compliance;

Continuous evaluation of statewide management and administrative procedures and practices, including but not limited to economic forecasting, technical assistance to state agencies, forms control, and special analytic studies as directed by the Governor; and

Staff planning functions of the state planning committee and evaluation of statewide management and administrative practices and procedures.

Governor’s Office for Policy and Management, headed by the state budget director. The state budget director shall maintain staff employed pursuant to KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry out the functions of the office relating to state budgeting as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection and state planning as provided in KRS Chapter 147, review of administrative regulations proposed by executive agencies prior to filing pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A and such other duties as may be assigned by the Governor.

Governor’s Office for Policy Research, headed by the state budget director. The Governor’s Office for Policy Research shall assist the state budget director in providing policy research data, information, and analysis to the Governor on public policy issues that impact the Commonwealth. The state budget director shall identify and direct the research to be completed and provided by the office. The state budget director shall maintain staff employed in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry out the functions of the office.

Governor’s Office for Economic Analysis, headed by the state budget director. The state budget director shall maintain staff employed in accordance with KRS Chapter 18A sufficient to carry out the functions of the office. The Governor’s Office for Economic Analysis shall carry out the revenue estimating and economic analysis functions and responsibilities, including but not limited to the functions and responsibilities assigned to the Office of State Budget Director by KRS Chapter 48. The Governor’s Office for Economic Analysis shall perform the tax administrative function of using tax data to provide the Department of Revenue with studies, projections, statistical analyses, and any other information that will assist the Department of Revenue in performing its tax administrative functions.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 186, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 279, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 46, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 85, § 28, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 78, § 23, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 53, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

11.070.
Governor may employ skilled or professional services.

The Governor may employ reputable, qualified, experienced auditors, accountants, clerks, bookkeepers and any other skilled or professional services to perform any service which the Governor deems proper and may direct.

History.

4618-170, 4618-173.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Attorneys, Governor may employ or approve employment of, KRS

12.210

.

11.080.
Definition of agency.

As used in KRS

11.090

to

11.110

, “agency” includes any department, program cabinet, institution, board, commission, office or agency of the state.

History.

Amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. I, § 3.

11.090.
Audit, study or survey of state agencies.

The Governor may, at any time, cause to be made a comprehensive and complete audit, study or survey of any agency of the state. The audit, study or survey shall extend back over such period of time as the Governor deems necessary to reveal the true financial condition of the agency, and shall be of such character as to ascertain any waste, duplication of efforts, useless or unnecessary offices or positions, faulty or inadequate systems of bookkeeping or accounting, improper budgeting, and all other facts deemed necessary by the Governor.

History.

4618-170.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Governor may require auditor to make audits, KRS

43.050

,

43.090

.

Governor may require information from officers, Ky. Const., § 78.

Governor to install uniform accounting and bookkeeping systems, KRS

12.130

.

Investigations and studies by Finance and Administration Cabinet, KRS

45.131

,

45.142

.

Legislative Research Commission, studies by, KRS

7.100

.

11.100.
Right to information — Access to records.

Any person employed by the Governor under the provisions of KRS

11.070

may, when authorized in writing by the Governor, require information on oath of any person touching any matter relative to any account which he is required to examine, study or audit. Any person having such written authority shall also have free and full access to all books, files, records and accounts of every agency of the state, useful for the full and complete performance of the duties assigned to him by the Governor.

History.

4618-171.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Power of employees of departments to swear and examine witnesses, KRS

12.120

.

11.110.
Compensation — From what fund paid.

The Governor shall fix the compensation of persons employed by him under the provisions of KRS

11.040

and

11.070

. If the services of the persons employed are rendered in or to any particular agency, their compensation and expenses may be charged to and paid out of the appropriation of that agency, when certified to the Finance and Administration Cabinet by the head of the agency and approved by the Governor. If there is no appropriation to the agency from which such compensation and expenses can properly be paid, the Governor may direct that they be paid out of the Governor’s emergency fund.

History.

4618-172: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 27, § 3, effective May 18, 1956; Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

11.120.
Practice of law prohibited.

The Governor and the Lieutenant Governor shall not engage in the practice of law during their terms of office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 58, § 1.

11.150.
Negotiations with Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois — Ratification of agreements.

The Governor is expressly authorized to negotiate with the appropriate authorities of Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois and to ratify any agreements with Indiana, Ohio, or Illinois, including but not limited to any agreements governing the registration of motor boats or the operation, equipment or safety of any vessel as defined in KRS

235.010

, which may be needed as a result of the decision of the Supreme Court of the United States in Kentucky v. Indiana, No. 81, Original, or the decision of the Supreme Court of the United States in Ohio v. Kentucky, No. 27, Original.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 272, § 4, effective July 15, 1986.

11.160.
Procedure for General Assembly confirmation of appointments by the Governor or other appointing authority.

When a statute specifically requires Senate confirmation of an appointment by the Governor or by other appointing authority, the appointment shall be handled in the following manner:

All names of persons nominated when the General Assembly is not in session shall be submitted for confirmation no later than the next regular session of the General Assembly. The Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver the name of the nominee to the clerk of the Senate upon appointment or no later than the fifteenth legislative day of the next regular session of the General Assembly. The Governor may submit a nominee for confirmation at any special session that occurs between the date of initial appointment and the next regular session of the General Assembly. If the Governor desires to submit the name of a nominee for confirmation at a special session of the General Assembly, he shall place confirmation of the nominee on the call for special session.

All names of persons nominated to positions during a regular session of the General Assembly shall be submitted for confirmation at that regular session. The Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall submit the name of the nominee, together with such accompanying information as may expedite the consideration of the appointment to the clerk of the Senate not more than three (3) legislative days after making the appointment, unless the appointment is made during the last fifteen (15) legislative days, in which case the nominee’s name and information shall be submitted not more than one (1) legislative day later.

For each nominee, the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver to the clerk of the Senate a letter of appointment. The letter of appointment shall be accompanied by a resume which contains at least the following information:

Complete employment history of the nominee;

Complete educational background of the nominee; and

Current and past employment by or financial relationships with the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions held by the nominee and any member of the nominee’s immediate family.

When a statute requires an interim legislative committee to hold a public hearing on a particular appointment, the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver the letter of appointment and resume for each nominee to the Legislative Research Commission within seven (7) days after making the appointment.

The Legislative Research Commission may utilize the services of its staff or other appropriate persons or organizations to investigate the background of nominees and to verify the information provided. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall conduct and provide a criminal record history on a nominee if requested by the Legislative Research Commission.

During periods when the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor’s or other appointing authority’s power of appointment shall not be diminished, and nominees may assume the responsibilities of the position pending confirmation. During that period, they shall be considered for all purposes to have been appointed and to be lawful occupants of the post to which they have been nominated, except that they shall be subject to the confirmation process when the General Assembly is next in regular session or special session called for the purpose of confirming the nominees.

If the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, fails to submit the name of the nominee or if the Senate declines to consider a nominee, the position shall become vacant as of sine die adjournment of the applicable special or regular session of the General Assembly at which the appointment was to be confirmed. If the Senate declines to confirm the nominee, the position shall become vacant upon the date the Senate declined to confirm.

Any person not confirmed by the Senate shall not be reappointed by the Governor, or other appointing authority, to the same position for which confirmation is required for a period of two (2) years from the date the Senate declined to confirm the nomination or the date of sine die adjournment if the Senate declined to consider the nomination.

When a statute specifically requires Senate and House of Representatives confirmation of an appointment by the Governor or by other appointing authority, the appointment shall be handled in the following manner:

All names of persons nominated when the General Assembly is not in session shall be submitted for confirmation no later than the next regular session of the General Assembly. The Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver the name of the nominee to the clerk of the House of Representatives no later than the fifteenth legislative day of the next regular session of the General Assembly. The Governor may submit a nominee for confirmation at any special session that occurs between the date of initial appointment and the next regular session of the General Assembly. If the Governor desires to submit the name of a nominee for confirmation at a special session of the General Assembly, he shall place confirmation of the nominee on the call for special session.

All names of persons nominated to positions during a regular session of the General Assembly shall be submitted for confirmation at that regular session. The Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall submit the name of the nominee to the clerk of the House of Representatives not more than three (3) legislative days after making the appointment, unless the appointment is made during the last fifteen (15) legislative days, in which case the nominee’s name and information shall be submitted not more than one (1) legislative day later.

For each nominee, the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver to the clerk of the House of Representatives a letter of appointment. The letter of appointment shall be accompanied by a resume which contains at least the following information:

Complete employment history of the nominee;

Complete educational background of the nominee; and

Current and past employment by or financial relationships with the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any of its political subdivisions held by the nominee and any member of the nominee’s immediate family.

When a statute requires an interim legislative committee to hold a public hearing on a particular appointment, the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, shall deliver the letter of appointment and resume for each nominee to the Legislative Research Commission within seven (7) days after making the appointment.

The Legislative Research Commission may utilize the services of its staff or other appropriate persons or organizations to investigate the background of nominees and to verify the information provided. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall conduct and provide a criminal record history on a nominee if requested by the Legislative Research Commission.

The confirmation shall originate in the House of Representatives. If the House of Representatives does not confirm an appointment, the Senate shall not consider the appointment.

When both the Senate and the House of Representatives have confirmed an appointment, the Senate shall notify the House of Representatives of the final approval. The clerk of the House shall then notify the Governor, or other appointing authority, and the appointee in writing of the General Assembly’s action.

During periods when the General Assembly is not in session, the Governor’s or other appointing authority’s power of appointment shall not be diminished, and nominees may assume the responsibilities of the position pending confirmation. During that period, they shall be considered for all purposes to have been appointed and to be lawful occupants of the post to which they have been nominated, except that they shall be subject to the confirmation process when the General Assembly is next in regular session or special session called for the purpose of confirming the nominees.

If the Governor who makes the appointment, or other appointing authority, fails to submit the name of the nominee or if the House of Representatives or the Senate declines to consider a nominee, the position shall become vacant as of sine die adjournment of the regular session of the General Assembly at which the appointment was to be confirmed. If the House of Representatives or the Senate declines to confirm the nominee, the position shall become vacant upon the date that a chamber of the General Assembly first declined to confirm.

Any person not confirmed by the House of Representatives or the Senate shall not be reappointed by the Governor, or other appointing authority, to the same position for which confirmation is required for a period of two (2) years from the date that a chamber of the General Assembly first declined to confirm the nomination, or the date of sine die adjournment if the House of Representatives or the Senate declined to consider the nomination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 505, § 1, effective April 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 415, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 85, § 4, effective June 26, 2007.

11.170.
Kentucky Agriculture Resources Development Authority. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 274, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2009, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2009, ch. 32, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

11.175.
Each cabinet to designate small business ombudsman — Contact information — Annual report to Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy.

Each cabinet secretary on the Governor’s Executive Cabinet, established pursuant to KRS

11.065

, shall designate a small business ombudsman from among their respective existing cabinet employees.

The small business ombudsman shall:

Respond to inquiries from small businesses on administrative regulations and other regulatory matters; and

Provide information regarding the procedure for submitting comments on administrative regulations as provided by KRS 13A.270(1).

Each cabinet shall provide contact information for the cabinet’s small business ombudsman on the cabinet’s Web site, including the ombudsman’s name, telephone number, mailing address, and e-mail address.

No later than December 1 of each year, each small business ombudsman shall submit a report to the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy, established pursuant to KRS

11.200

, summarizing the number and nature of inquiries that the ombudsman has received from small businesses during the previous twelve (12) months.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 166, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2021 ch. 185, § 95, effective June 29, 2021.